Nevada, session 83, SB77.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 408.178 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.178 1. Each Deputy Director:
(a) Is in the unclassified service of the State.
(b) Must [hold] :
(1) Hold a [master’s] bachelor’s degree in business, public
or business administration, [hold the] economics or any other field
related to a field described in this subparagraph;
(2) Hold a degree of bachelor of science in civil, structural,
mechanical , environmental, traffic or industrial engineering ; [,] or
[be]
(3) Be a licensed professional engineer.
(c) Must have at least:
-
*SB77*

– 4 –
(1) Two years of administrative experience as an assistant
director or the Chief Engineer; or
(2) Fifteen years of progressively responsible experience in
engineering , [or] project management [.] or a related field.
2. The Chief Engineer:
(a) Is in the unclassified service of the State.
(b) Must be a licensed professional engineer.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, must have at
least 3 years of experience as the final engineering authority for a
state’s agency which has duties similar to those of the Department.
3. If the Director or the Deputy Director appointed pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 408.175 is a licensed
professional engineer, he or she may also act as the Department’s
Chief Engineer.
Sec. 2. NRS 408.3195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.3195 1. Before the Department submits a proposal for a
highway project to the Board for approval, the Department shall
prepare a written analysis of the costs and benefits of the project.
The analysis must state, for each highway district in which the
project is proposed:
(a) The limits of the project;
(b) The period of analysis;
(c) The discount rate used in the analysis;
(d) The initial costs of the Department for the project, including
any costs for design, engineering, the acquisition of land and
construction;
(e) The future costs of the Department to preserve and maintain
the project, discounted to present value;
(f) Any other costs of the Department for any other construction
or any mitigation associated with the project;
(g) The costs to highway users for any loss of safety, delays in
the time of travel and costs for the operation of vehicles that are
associated with the project;
(h) The costs of any environmental impacts, including vehicle
emissions and noise, that are associated with the project; and
(i) The value of the benefits of the project, including the value of
any:
(1) Savings in the time of travel;
(2) Improvements to safety; and
(3) Savings in the cost of operating vehicles.
2. The analysis required by this section:
(a) Must include a discussion of any additional increases in costs
that would result from any delays in the performance of any routine
maintenance scheduled under the maintenance program of the
Department;
-
*SB77*

– 5 –
(b) May include a discussion of:
(1) The costs of the project for any other persons and
governmental agencies;
(2) The value of any other social, economic or environmental
benefits or costs of the project; and
(3) Any costs or benefits which may result from the use of
any alternative design, construction or financing practices; and
(c) Must be prepared in a format that allows for the comparison
of proposed highway projects.
3. The analysis required by this section must be made available
to the Board and the public when the agenda is posted for the
meeting at which the proposal will be submitted to the Board for its
approval.
4. As used in this section, “highway project” means a project
that is expected to increase the capacity of the state highway system
and cost at least [$25 million.] $50,000,000.
Sec. 3. NRS 408.323 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.323 1. Whenever it can be justified by the Director that
limited work or improvements can be done in a more economical or
other satisfactory manner than by contract under NRS 408.327, the
Director may [, with the approval of the Board,] execute such work
or improvements with Department facilities and employees.
2. In the event of disaster or great emergency the Director may
[, with the approval of the Board,] hire, employ or contract for such
labor, materials and equipment as are in the Director’s opinion
necessary to reroute, repair or replace any highway threatened or
damaged by the emergency or disaster, and the provisions of NRS
408.327 and 408.367 do not apply. The Director shall report each
such hiring, employment and contract to the Board at the next
regularly scheduled meeting of the Board.
Sec. 4. NRS 408.327 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.327 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 408.3875 to
408.3888, inclusive:
1. Whenever the provisions of NRS 408.323 do not apply, the
Director shall advertise for bids for such work on projects estimated
to cost in excess of $750,000 according to the plans and
specifications prepared by the Director. The Department shall post
such an advertisement for bids on the Internet website of the
Department for a period beginning at the time the solicitation is
released until the time set for opening bids, which must not be less
than 15 days after the release of the solicitation.
2. The advertisement must state the place where the bidders
may obtain or inspect the plans and specifications and the time and
place for opening the plans and specifications.
-
*SB77*

– 6 –
[3. Publication of the advertisement must be made at least once
a week for 2 consecutive weeks for a total of at least two
publications in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
which the major portion of the proposed improvement or
construction is to be made, and the advertisement must also be
published at least once a week for 2 consecutive weeks for a total of
at least two publications in one or more daily papers of general
circulation throughout the State. The first publication of the
advertisement in the daily newspapers having general circulation
throughout the State must be made not less than 15 days before the
time set for opening bids.]
Sec. 5. NRS 408.333 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.333 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 408.367 or
408.3875 to 408.3888, inclusive:
1. Before [furnishing] any person [proposing to] may bid on
any advertised [work with the plans and specifications for such]
work, the Director shall require from the person a statement,
verified under oath, in the form of answers to questions contained in
a standard form of questionnaire and financial statement, which
must include a complete statement of the person’s financial ability
and experience in performing public work and any other comparable
experience.
2. Such statements must be filed with the Director in ample
time to permit the Department to verify the information contained
therein in advance of [furnishing proposal forms, plans and
specifications to] any person [proposing to bid] bidding on the
advertised public work, in accordance with the regulations of the
Department.
3. Whenever the Director is not satisfied with the sufficiency
of the answers contained in the questionnaire and financial
statement, the Director may [refuse to furnish] disqualify the person
[with plans and specifications and the official proposal forms] from
bidding on the advertised project. If the Director determines that the
person has, within the preceding year, materially breached a contract
for a public work for which the cost exceeds $25,000,000, the
Director shall [refuse to furnish] disqualify the person [with plans
and specifications and the official proposal forms] from bidding on
the advertised project. [Any bid of any person to whom plans and
specifications and the official proposal forms have not been issued
in accordance with this section must be disregarded, and the
certified check, cash or undertaking of such a bidder returned
forthwith.]
4. Any person who is disqualified by the Director, in
accordance with the provisions of this section, may request, in
writing, a hearing before the Director and present again the person’s
-
*SB77*

– 7 –
check, cash or undertaking and such further evidence with respect to
the person’s financial responsibility, organization, plant and
equipment, or experience, as might tend to justify, in his or her
opinion, [issuance to him or her of the plans and specifications]
authorizing the person to bid for the work.
5. Such a person may appeal the decision of the Director to the
Board no later than 5 days before the opening of the bids on the
project. If the appeal is sustained by the Board, the person must be
granted the rights and privileges of all other bidders.
Sec. 6. NRS 408.337 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.337 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 408.3875 to
408.3888, inclusive:
1. All bids must be accompanied by an undertaking executed
by a corporate surety authorized to do business in the State, or by
cash or a certified check in an amount equal to at least 5 percent of
the amount bid. Such undertaking, cash or check furnished to
accompany a bid submitted on-line pursuant to NRS 408.343 must
be furnished in accordance with the procedures set forth by the
Director.
2. If the successful bidder fails to execute the contract in
accordance with [his or her] the successful bid and give any bond
required by law and the contract and bond are not postmarked or
delivered to the Department within 20 days after award of the
contract, the undertaking, cash or certified check is forfeited and the
proceeds must be paid into the State Highway Fund.
3. The failure of the successful bidder to furnish any bond
required of the bidder by law within the time fixed for [his or her]
the bidder’s execution of the contract constitutes a failure to execute
the contract.
4. If the Director deems it is for the best interests of the State,
the Director may, on refusal or failure of the successful bidder to
execute the contract, award it to the second lowest responsible
bidder. If the second lowest responsible bidder fails or refuses to
execute the contract, the Director may likewise award it to the third
lowest responsible bidder. On the failure or refusal to execute the
contract of the second or third lowest bidder to whom a contract is
so awarded, their bidder’s security is likewise forfeited to the State.
5. The bidder’s security of the second and third lowest
responsible bidders may be withheld by the Department until the
contract has been finally executed and the bond given as required
under the provisions of the contract, at which time the security must
be returned. The bidder’s security submitted by all other
unsuccessful bidders must be returned to them within 10 days after
the contract is awarded.
-
*SB77*

– 8 –
Sec. 7. NRS 408.343 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.343 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 408.3875 to
408.3888, inclusive:
(a) All bids must be submitted:
(1) Under sealed cover and received at the address in Nevada
stated in the advertisement for bids and must be opened publicly and
read at the time stated in the advertisement; or
(2) Pursuant to the process of on-line bidding established by
the Director.
(b) No bids may be received after the time stated in the
advertisement even though bids are not opened exactly at the time
stated in the advertisement. No bid, whether submitted in
accordance with subparagraph (1) or (2) of paragraph (a), may be
opened before that time.
(c) Any bid may be withdrawn [by request] at any time before
the time stated in the advertisement. The withdrawal must be [filed
with the Director and] executed by the authorized bidder . [or the
bidder’s duly authorized representative. The withdrawal may be
filed electronically.] The withdrawal of a bid does not prejudice the
right of the bidder to file a new bid before the time stated in the
advertisement.
(d) The Department may reject any bid or all bids if, in the
opinion of the Department, the bids are unbalanced, incomplete,
contain irregularities of any kind or for any good cause.
(e) Until the final award of the contract, the Department may
reject or accept any bids and may waive technical errors contained
in the bids, as may be deemed best for the interests of the State.
(f) In awarding a contract, the Department shall make the award
to the lowest responsible bidder who has qualified and submitted his
or her bid in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.
2. The Director may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
3. As used in this section, “on-line bidding” means a process:
(a) That is established by the Director; and
(b) By which bidders submit proposals or bids for contracts on a
secure website on the Internet or its successor, if any, which is
established and maintained by the Department for that purpose.
Sec. 8. NRS 408.367 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.367 1. [With the approval of the Board, the] The
Director may receive informal bids and award contracts for highway
construction, reconstruction, improvements, and maintenance on
projects estimated to cost not in excess of [$250,000.] $750,000.
2. Before [furnishing] any person [proposing to] may bid on
any solicited [work with the plans and specifications for such] work,
the Director shall require from the person a statement, verified under
-
*SB77*

– 9 –
oath, in the form of answers to questions contained in a standard
form of questionnaire, which must include information describing:
(a) The geographical regions of this State in which the person is
willing to perform the public work;
(b) The type of license and classification, if any, held by the
person; and
(c) The state business license held by the person and its
expiration date.
3. Before awarding a contract pursuant to subsection 1, the
Director must:
(a) If the estimated cost of the project is [$50,000 or] less [,]
than $100,000, solicit a bid from at least one properly licensed
contractor; and
(b) If the estimated cost of the project is $100,000 or more [than
$50,000] but not more than [$250,000,] $750,000, solicit bids from
at least three properly licensed contractors.
4. Any bids received in response to a solicitation for bids made
pursuant to subsection 3 may be rejected if the Director determines
that:
(a) The quality of the services, materials, equipment or labor
offered does not conform to the approved plan or specifications;
(b) The bidder is not responsive or responsible; or
(c) The public interest would be served by such a rejection.
5. At least once each quarter, the Director shall prepare a report
detailing, for each project for which a contract for its completion is
awarded pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3, if any:
(a) The name of the contractor to whom the contract was
awarded;
(b) The amount of the contract awarded;
(c) A brief description of the project; and
(d) The names of all contractors from whom bids were solicited.
6. A report prepared pursuant to subsection 5 is a public record
and must be maintained on file at the principal offices of the
Department.
7. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 408.354, contracts
awarded pursuant to the provisions of this section must be
accompanied by bonds and conditioned and executed in the name of
the State of Nevada, and must be signed by the Director under the
seal of the Department, and by the contracting party or parties. The
form and legality of those contracts must be approved by the
Attorney General or Chief Counsel of the Department.
Sec. 9. NRS 408.387 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.387 1. Before making final payment on any contract as
provided in this chapter the Director shall cause the [publication]
posting of a notice of the date of final acceptance of the contract for
-
*SB77*

– 10 –
a period of at least 2 weeks [in every issue of a newspaper of
general circulation in the county wherein the major portion of the
contract work was performed, and such notice may also be
published each day for a period of at least 10 days in one or more
daily newspapers of general circulation throughout the State.] on the
Internet website of the Department.
2. No final settlement of the contract may be made with the
contractor until 30 days after the date of such final acceptance of the
contract.
Sec. 10. NRS 408.3881 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.3881 1. The Department shall not contract with a design-
build team with respect to a project unless the Board makes the
determinations, at a public meeting, that are required pursuant to
NRS 408.388.
2. If the Department is required to hold a public meeting
pursuant to this section, the Department shall publish notice of the
meeting in a newspaper qualified under chapter 238 of NRS that is
of general circulation in this state.
Sec. 11. NRS 408.3883 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.3883 1. The Department shall advertise for preliminary
proposals for the design and construction of a project by a design-
build team [in a newspaper of general circulation in this State.] by
posting a request for preliminary proposals on the Internet website
of the Department.
2. A request for preliminary proposals [published] posted
pursuant to subsection 1 must include, without limitation:
(a) A description of the proposed project;
(b) Separate estimates of the costs of designing and constructing
the project;
(c) The dates on which it is anticipated that the separate phases
of the design and construction of the project will begin and end;
(d) The date by which preliminary proposals must be submitted
to the Department, which must not be less than 30 days after the
date that the request for preliminary proposals is first [published in a
newspaper] posted pursuant to subsection 1; and
(e) A statement setting forth the place and time in which a
design-build team desiring to submit a proposal for the project may
obtain the information necessary to submit a proposal, including,
without limitation, the information set forth in subsection 3.
3. The Department shall maintain at the time and place set
forth in the request for preliminary proposals the following
information for inspection by a design-build team desiring to submit
a proposal for the project:
(a) The extent to which designs must be completed for both
preliminary and final proposals and any other requirements for the
-
*SB77*

– 11 –
design and construction of the project that the Department
determines to be necessary;
(b) A list of the requirements set forth in NRS 408.3884;
(c) A list of the factors that the Department will use to evaluate
design-build teams who submit a proposal for the project, including,
without limitation:
(1) The relative weight to be assigned to each factor pursuant
to NRS 408.3886; and
(2) A disclosure of whether the factors that are not related to
cost are, when considered as a group, more or less important in the
process of evaluation than the factor of cost;
(d) Notice that a design-build team desiring to submit a proposal
for the project must include with its proposal the information used
by the Department to determine finalists among the design-build
teams submitting proposals pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
408.3885 and a description of that information;
(e) A statement that a design-build team whose prime contractor
holds a certificate of eligibility to receive a preference in bidding on
public works issued pursuant to NRS 338.1389 or 338.147 and
whose members who hold a certificate of registration to practice
architecture or a license as a professional engineer and who hold a
certificate of eligibility to receive a preference when competing for
public works issued pursuant to NRS 338.173 should submit with its
proposal a copy of each certificate of eligibility and a signed
affidavit that meets the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS
338.0117; and
(f) A statement as to whether a design-build team that is selected
as a finalist pursuant to NRS 408.3885 but is not awarded the
design-build contract pursuant to NRS 408.3886 will be partially
reimbursed for the cost of preparing a final proposal or best and
final offer, or both, and, if so, an estimate of the amount of the
partial reimbursement.
Sec. 12. NRS 408.389 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.389 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
Department shall not purchase any equipment which exceeds
[$50,000,] $150,000, unless the purchase is first approved by the
Board.
2. Before the Board may approve the purchase of any mobile
equipment which exceeds [$50,000,] $150,000, the Department
shall:
(a) Prepare and present to the Board an analysis of the costs and
benefits, including, without limitation, all related personnel costs,
that are associated with:
(1) Purchasing, operating and maintaining the same item of
equipment;
-
*SB77*

– 12 –
(2) Leasing, operating and maintaining the same item of
mobile equipment; or
(3) Contracting for the performance of the work which would
have been performed using the mobile equipment; and
(b) Justify the need for the purchase based on that analysis.
3. The Board shall not:
(a) Delegate to the Director its authority to approve purchases of
equipment pursuant to subsection 1; or
(b) Approve any purchase of mobile equipment which exceeds
[$50,000] $150,000 and for which the Department is unable to
provide justification pursuant to subsection 2.
Sec. 13. NRS 408.507 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.507 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, real
property held in fee or improvements on the property acquired by
the Department in advance of the actual construction, reconstruction
or improvement of highways or in order to avoid the payment of
excessive damages, or held by the Department pending a
determination in the future on its use or disposal may be leased or
rented by the Department for fair market value in such manner and
for such periods as are determined by the Director to be in the best
interests of the State.
2. The Director may lease to a local government for $1 per year
real property held in fee by the Department that has been acquired
by the Department in advance of the actual construction,
reconstruction or improvement of highways or held by the
Department pending a determination in the future on its use or
disposal if:
(a) Such real property will be used by the local government for a
community garden or urban farm;
(b) The local government attests in writing that the local
government will prioritize community gardens and urban farms that:
(1) Hire at least a portion of the employees from residents of
the local community;
(2) Provide training for members of the local community to
participate in gardening or farming;
(3) Allow members of the local community to provide input
on the foods grown in the community garden or urban farm; and
(4) Collaborate with school garden programs in the
surrounding community and encourage students from those school
garden programs to participate in the community garden or urban
farm; and
(c) Such real property will use sources of renewable energy,
including, without limitation, solar energy, to operate the
community garden or urban farm.
-
*SB77*

– 13 –
3. The Director may lease for fair market value space above
and below the established grade line of the highway to state and
public agencies and private persons in such manner and for such
periods as the Director determines are in the best interest of the
State, if:
(a) The full use and safety of the highway will not be impaired;
(b) Vehicular or pedestrian access to that space will not be
required or permitted from the established grade line; and
(c) The free flow of traffic on the highway is not interfered with
in any way.
4. All leases of an interest in real property entered into by the
Department before April 1, 1985, are hereby ratified. All other
leases entered into pursuant to subsection 3 must be approved by the
Board subject to the provisions of subsection 5.
5. If the Department receives a proposal to negotiate a lease
pursuant to subsection 3, it shall publish [a notice] for not less than
2 weeks in a newspaper [of general circulation at least once a week
for 2 weeks,] qualified under chapter 238 of NRS that is published
in the county in which the property to be leased is located, a notice
stating that it has received the proposal and that it will receive other
proposals for use of the space for 60 days after the completion of the
publication. A copy of the notice must be mailed to each local
governmental unit in the affected area. If the property is leased, it
must be to the highest bidder for the space. The requirements for
publication and notice do not apply if the proposal was received
from an owner who controls the property on both sides of the
highway.
6. All money received for leases and rentals must be deposited
with the State Treasurer to be credited to the State Highway Fund.
Sec. 14. NRS 408.533 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.533 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 37.270, all
real property, interests therein or improvements thereon and
personal property acquired before, on or after April 1, 1957, in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 408.487 and 408.489 must,
after approval by the Board and if no longer needed for highway
purposes, be disposed of by the Director in accordance with the
provisions of subsection 2, except that:
(a) When the property was originally donated to the State, no
charge may be made if it is returned to the original owner or to the
holder of the reversionary right.
(b) When the property has been wholly or partially paid for by
towns, cities or counties, disposal of the property and of money
received therefor must be agreed upon by the governing bodies of
the towns, cities and counties and the Department.
-
*SB77*

– 14 –
(c) When the title to the real property has been acquired in fee
pursuant to NRS 408.487 and 408.489 and, in the opinion of the
Board, a sale by means of a public auction or sealed bids is
uneconomical or impractical because:
(1) There is no access to the property;
(2) The property has value or an increased value only to a
single adjoining property owner; or
(3) Such a sale would work an undue hardship upon a
property owner as a result of a severance of the property of that
owner or a denial of access to a public highway,
 the Board may enter into a direct sale of the property with such
an owner or any other person for its fair market value.
(d) When the property has been acquired and the property or any
portion of the property is no longer needed for highway purposes,
the Department shall give notice of its intention to dispose of the
property by publication in a newspaper [of general circulation]
qualified under chapter 238 of NRS that is published in the county
where the property is situated. The notice must include the
Department’s appraisal of the fair market value of the property. Any
person from whom the property was purchased or the person’s heir
or grantee may purchase the property at its fair market value by
direct sale from the Department within 60 days after the notice is
published. If more than one person qualified to purchase the
property by direct sale pursuant to this paragraph so requests, the
person with the superior claim, as determined by the Department in
its sole discretion, is entitled to purchase the property by direct sale.
If a person who is entitled to purchase the property by direct sale
pursuant to this paragraph reasonably believes that the Department’s
appraisal of the property is greater than the fair market value of the
property, the person may file an objection to the appraisal with the
Department. The Department shall set forth the procedure for filing
an objection and the process under which a final determination will
be made of the fair market value of the property for which an
objection is filed. The Department shall sell the property in the
manner provided in subsection 2 if:
(1) No person requests to purchase the property by direct sale
within 60 days after the notice is published pursuant to this
paragraph; or
(2) A person who files an objection pursuant to this
paragraph fails, within 10 business days after receipt of a written
notice of the final determination of the fair market value of the
property, to notify the Department in writing that he or she wishes to
purchase the property at the fair market value set forth in the notice.
-
*SB77*

– 15 –
(e) When the property is sought by another public agency for a
reasonable public use, the Department may first offer the property to
the public agency at its fair market value.
2. All property, interests or improvements not included within
the provisions of subsection 1 must first be offered for sale by the
Department singly or in combination at public auction or by sealed
bids. If the highest bid received is 90 percent or more of the
Department’s appraisal of the fair market value of the property, the
property may be sold to the highest bidder. The notice and the terms
of the sale must be published in a newspaper [of general circulation
in the county where the property is situated.] qualified under
chapter 238 of NRS. The auctions and openings of bids must be
conducted by the Department. If the property cannot be sold for 90
percent or more of its fair market value, the Department may enter
into a written listing agreement with a person licensed pursuant to
chapter 645 of NRS to sell or lease the property for 90 percent or
more of its fair market value.
3. It is conclusively presumed in favor of the Department and
any purchaser for value that the Department acted within its lawful
authority in acquiring and disposing of the property, and that the
Director acted within his or her lawful authority in executing any
conveyance vesting title in the purchaser. All such conveyances
must be quitclaim in nature and the Department shall not warrant
title, furnish title insurance or pay the tax on transfer of real
property.
4. No person has a right of action against the Department or its
employees for a violation of this section. This subsection does not
prevent an action by the Attorney General on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any aggrieved person.
5. All sums of money received by the Department for the sale
of real and personal property must be deposited with the State
Treasurer to be credited to the State Highway Fund, unless the
Federal Highway Administration participated in acquisition of the
property, in which case a pro rata share of the money obtained by
disposal of the property must be paid to the Federal Highway
Administration.
6. The Department may reserve and except easements, rights or
interests from the conveyance of any real property disposed of in
accordance with this section or exchanged pursuant to subsection 5
of NRS 408.489. The easements, rights or interests include, but are
not limited to:
(a) Abutter’s rights of light, view or air.
(b) Easements of access to and from abutting land.
-
*SB77*

– 16 –
(c) Covenants prohibiting the use of signs, structures or devices
advertising activities not conducted, services not rendered or goods
not produced or available on the real property.
Sec. 15. NRS 408.537 is hereby amended to read as follows:
408.537 1. Upon receipt of an application for consent to
close a public road on public land, the Department shall give written
notice of the application to the planning agencies of the local
governments, within 1 week after its receipt of the application.
2. Each planning agency so notified shall within 45 days after
the notice is sent hold a public hearing on the application at the
place where it normally meets. If the road is located within the
jurisdiction of two or more planning agencies, each of those
agencies must hold a hearing.
3. Each planning agency shall notify the public and every
person known to have a vested private right-of-way over the road
for the purpose of grazing, mining or any other purpose for which
such a private right vests, by publication in one issue of a newspaper
[of general circulation published in each of the counties in which the
land is located] qualified under chapter 238 of NRS and by mailing
to the last known address of each private user of the road. The
notice must be published at least 20 days before the date set for the
hearing and set forth the location of the road and the purpose for
closing it as stated in the application. The cost of publishing the
notice must be borne by the United States or by someone in its
behalf.
4. The planning agency shall deliver its written
recommendation on the application, including the reasons for its
recommendation, to the Department within 15 days after the
conclusion of its hearing on the application.
5. The application must contain such information and
supporting documents as are prescribed in regulations adopted by
the Department with the approval of the Board.
Sec. 16. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
H
-
*SB77*